en: Changing Tables
xx: Changing Tables
cs: Přebalovací stoly
da: Pusleborde
de: Wickeltische
es: Cambiadores
fr: Tables à langer, Table à langer, Meuble à langer
it: Fasciatoi
ja: おむつ交換台
nl: Commodes
no: Stellebord
pl: Przewijaki
pt: Trocadores
ru: Пеленальные столы
sv: Skötbord
tr: Bebek Alt Değiştirme Masaları

en: Crib & Toddler Bed Accessories
xx: Crib & Toddler Bed Accessories
cs: Dětské postýlky – příslušenství
da: Tremmesenge og børnesenge – tilbehør
de: Gitter- & Kinderbettzubehör
es: Accesorios para cunas y camas para niños
fr: Accessoires pour lits de bébé et d'enfant
it: Accessori per lettini bambino
ja: ベビーベッド関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor peuter- en kinderbedjes
no: Tilbehør til barnesenger
pl: Akcesoria do łóżeczek i łóżek dziecinnych
pt: Acessórios para berço e cama infantil
ru: Принадлежности для детских кроватей
sv: Tillbehör till spjälsängar och barnsängar
tr: Bebek Karyolası ve Küçük Çocuk Yatağı Aksesuarları

en: Crib Bumpers & Liners
xx: Crib Bumpers & Liners
cs: Mantinely do dětských postýlek
da: Sengerande
de: Bettnestchen & Randschutz für Gitterbetten
es: Acolchados y revestimientos para cunas
fr: Bordures et tours de lits de bébé, Tour de lit, Tours de lit, Tour de lit rembourré, Tours de lit rembourrés
it: Paracolpi per lettino
ja: ベビーベッド用ベッドガード
nl: Bedbumpers en -beveiliging
no: Barnesengpolstring og -kledning
pl: Osłonki do łóżeczek dziecinnych
pt: Protetores de berço
ru: Детские защитные уголки для кроватей
sv: Kuddar och insatser till spjälsängar
tr: Bebek Karyolası Yan Koruma Yastıkları ve Kenarlıkları

en: Crib Conversion Kits
xx: Crib Conversion Kits
cs: Sady na přestavbu dětských postýlek
da: Kravlesengesæt
de: Umbausätze für Gitterbetten
es: Kits de conversión para cunas
fr: Kits de conversion de lits de bébé
it: Kit trasformazione culla
ja: ベビーベッド組み換えキット
nl: Ombouwsets voor peuterbedjes
no: Konverteringssett for barnesenger
pl: Barierki do łóżeczek dziecinnych
pt: Kits para conversão de berço
ru: Наборы для изменения детских кроватей
sv: Konverteringskit för spjälsängar
tr: Bebek Karyolası Dönüştürme Setleri

en: Cribs & Toddler Beds
xx: Cribs & Toddler Beds
cs: Ohrádky a dětské postýlky
da: Tremmesenge og børnesenge
de: Gitterbetten & Kleinkinderbetten
es: Cunas y camas para niños
fr: Lits de bébé
it: Lettini e letti per bimbi
ja: ベビーベッド
nl: Peuter- en kinderbedjes
no: Barnesenger
pl: Łóżeczka i łóżka dziecinne
pt: Berços e camas infantis
ru: Кровати для детей и младенцев
sv: Spjälsängar och barnsängar
tr: Bebek Karyolaları ve Küçük Çocuk Yatakları

en: High Chair & Booster Seat Accessories
xx: High Chair & Booster Seat Accessories
cs: Dětské židle a sedačky – příslušenství
da: Høje stole og børnesæder – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Hochstühle und Sitzerhöhungen
es: Accesorios para tronas y alzadores
fr: Accessoires pour chaises hautes et rehausseurs
it: Accessori per seggioloni e rialzi per sedie
ja: ハイチェア・ベビーチェア用品
nl: Accessoires voor kinderstoelen en stoelverhogers
no: Tilbehør til barnestoler og barneseter
pl: Akcesoria do wysokich krzeseł i fotelików samochodowych
pt: Acessórios para cadeiras de refeição
ru: Принадлежности для высоких стульев и подушек для кормления детей
sv: Tillbehör till barnstolar och sittdynor
tr: Mama Sandalyesi ve Koltuk Yükseltici Aksesuarları

en: High Chairs & Booster Seats
xx: High Chairs & Booster Seats
cs: Dětské židličky a sedačky
da: Højstole og børnesæder
de: Hochstühle & Sitzerhöhungen
es: Tronas y alzadores
fr: Chaises hautes et réhausseurs
it: Seggioloni e seggiolini
ja: ハイチェア・ベビーチェア
nl: Kinderstoelen en stoelverhogers
no: Barnestoler og -seter
pl: Krzesełka do karmienia i siedziska na krzesła
pt: Cadeirões e assentos elevatórios
ru: Высокие стулья и подушки для кормления детей
sv: Barnstolar och sittdynor
tr: Mama Sandalyeleri ve Yükselen Koltuklar

en: Beds & Accessories
xx: Beds & Accessories
cs: Postele a doplňky
da: Senge og tilbehør
de: Betten & Zubehör
es: Camas y accesorios
fr: Lits et accessoires
it: Letti e accessori
ja: ベッド・ベッド用品
nl: Bedden en accessoires
no: Senger og tilbehør
pl: Łóżka i akcesoria
pt: Camas e acessórios
ru: Кровати и постельные принадлежности
sv: Sängar och tillbehör
tr: Yataklar ve Aksesuarlar

en: Bed
da: Seng
fr: Lit
sv: Säng

en: Bed & Bed Frame Accessories
xx: Bed & Bed Frame Accessories
cs: Doplňky k postelím
da: Sengetilbehør
de: Bett- & Bettrahmenzubehör
es: Accesorios para camas y somieres
fr: Accessoires pour lits et cadres de lit
it: Accessori per letti e telai per letto
ja: ベッド用品
nl: Accessoires voor bedden
no: Tilbehør til seng og sengeramme
pl: Akcesoria do łóżek
pt: Acessórios para cama
ru: Принадлежности для кроватей
sv: Sängtillbehör
tr: Yatak ve Yatak Çerçevesi Aksesuarları

en: Beds & Bed Frames
xx: Beds & Bed Frames
cs: Postele a postelové rámy
da: Senge og sengerammer
de: Betten & Bettgestelle
es: Camas y somieres
fr: Lits et cadres de lit, Cadre de lit, Couchette enfant, Structure de lit
it: Letti e telai per letti
ja: ベッド・ベッドフレーム
nl: Bedden en ledikanten
no: Senger og sengerammer
pl: Łóżka i ramy łóżek
pt: Camas e estruturas de camas
ru: Кровати и кроватные рамы
sv: Sängar och sängramar
tr: Yataklar ve Yatak Çerçeveleri

en: Headboards & Footboards
xx: Headboards & Footboards
cs: Čela a pelesti
da: Hovedgærder og fodgærder
de: Kopf- & Fußenden
es: Cabeceros y pies de cama
fr: Têtes et pieds de lit, Tête de lit
it: Testiere e controtestiere
ja: ヘッドボード・フットボード
nl: Hoofdborden en voetborden
no: Hodegjerder og fotstykker
pl: Zagłówki i oparcia na stopy
pt: Cabeceiras e estribos de camas
ru: Передние и задние спинки кроватей
sv: Sänggavlar
tr: Karyola Başlıkları ve Ayaklıkları

en: Mattress Foundations
xx: Mattress Foundations
cs: Postelové rošty
da: Undersenge
de: Matratzen-Untergestelle
es: Somieres
fr: Sommiers
it: Basi per materassi
ja: マットレスベース
nl: Matrasbodems
no: Rammemadrasser
pl: Podstawy pod materace
pt: Estrados
ru: Основания для матрасов
sv: Resårbottnar
tr: Yatak Altlıkları

en: Mattresses
xx: Mattresses
cs: Matrace
da: Madrasser
de: Matratzen
es: Colchones
fr: Matelas, Matelas (en mousse, à ressorts...)
it: Materassi
ja: マットレス
nl: Matrassen
no: Madrasser
pl: Materace
pt: Colchões
ru: Матрасы
sv: Madrasser
tr: Döşekler

en: Benches
xx: Benches
cs: Lavice
da: Bænke
de: Sitzbänke
es: Bancos
fr: Bancs
it: Panche
ja: ベンチ・スツール
nl: Banken
no: Benker
pl: Ławki
pt: Bancos
ru: Скамьи
sv: Bänkar
tr: Banklar

en: Kitchen & Dining Benches
xx: Kitchen & Dining Benches
cs: Kuchyňské a jídelní lavice
da: Køkken- og spisestuebænke
de: Küchen- & Eckbänke
es: Bancos de comedor y cocina
fr: Bancs de cuisine et salle à manger
it: Panche per cucina e sala da pranzo
ja: ダイニングベンチ
nl: Keuken- en eettafelbanken
no: Kjøkken- og spisebenker
pl: Ławki do kuchni i jadalni
pt: Bancos de cozinha e sala de jantar
ru: Кухонные и обеденные скамьи
sv: Köks- och matbänkar
tr: Mutfak ve Yemek Odası Bankları

en: Storage & Entryway Benches
xx: Storage & Entryway Benches
cs: Skladovací a předsíňové lavice
da: Opbevaringsbænke
de: Truhen- & Flurbänke
es: Bancos para recibidores y almacenamiento
fr: Bancs coffres
it: Cassapanche e panche per ingressi
ja: 収納ベンチ
nl: Opberg- en halbanken
no: Lagrings- og inngangsbenker
pl: Ławki do garderoby i przedpokoju
pt: Bancos de baú e entrada
ru: Скамьи для прихожих
sv: Förvaringsbänkar och hallbänkar
tr: Sandıklı Banklar ve Antre Bankları

en: Vanity Benches
xx: Vanity Benches
cs: Toaletní sedátka
da: Pyntebænke
de: Schminktischhocker
es: Bancos de tocador
fr: Bancs de coiffeuse
it: Panchette imbottite
ja: ドレッサースツール
nl: Toilettafelkrukjes
no: Sminkestoler
pl: Pufy do toaletek
pt: Bancos de penteadeira
ru: Изящные скамейки
sv: Vanity-bänkar
tr: Dekoratif Banklar

en: Cabinets & Storage
xx: Cabinets & Storage
cs: Skříně a úložné prostory
da: Skabe og opbevaring
de: Schränke
es: Armarios y almacenamiento
fr: Armoires et meubles de rangement, Meuble de rangement, Rangement, Colonne de rangement, Caisson (meuble), Casserolier, Garde-manger, Lingère, Meuble colonne, Meuble de séparation, Meuble de tri, Structure de rangement, Placard, Rayonnage, Vitrine
it: Armadietti e portaoggetti
ja: 収納家具
nl: Kasten en opbergmeubelen
no: Skap og lagerplass
pl: Szafy i przechowywanie
pt: Armários e armazenamento
ru: Шкафы и мебель для хранения
sv: Skåp och lagring
tr: Dolaplar ve Saklama Mobilyaları

en: Armoires & Wardrobes
xx: Armoires & Wardrobes
cs: Almary
da: Klædeskabe og garderobeskabe
de: Kleiderschränke
es: Armarios roperos
fr: Armoires, Armoire, Penderie, Dressing
it: Armadi
ja: 衣装ダンス・ワードローブ
nl: Grote kledingkasten
no: Klesskap og garderobeskap
pl: Szafy i garderoby
pt: Guarda-roupas
ru: Гардеробы
sv: Skåp och garderober
tr: Dekoratif Dolaplar ve Gardıroplar